Washington statutes.
RCW 27.12.300

Gifts—Title to property.

The title to money or property given to or for the use or benefit of a library shall vest in the board of trustees, to be held and used according to the terms of the gift.

[ 1935 c 119 s 18; RRS s 8226-18. Prior: 1909 c 116 s 20; 1901 c 166 s 20.]